District of Columbia statutes.
2-381.09

Penalties for false representations.

Whoever makes or presents to any officer or employee of the District of Columbia government, or to any department or agency thereof, any claim upon or against the District of Columbia, or any department or agency thereof, knowing such claim to be false, fictitious, or fraudulent, shall be imprisoned not more than one year and assessed a fine of not more than $100,000 for each violation of this chapter. The Attorney General for the District of Columbia shall prosecute violations of this section. The fine set forth in this section shall not be limited by § 22-3571.01.

History

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 821, 32 DCR 7396
as added May 8, 1998, D.C. Law 12-104, § 2(g), 45 DCR 1687
Mar. 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-232, § 2(g), 59 DCR 13632
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 112(a), 60 DCR 2064

Section References

This section is referenced in § 2-308.21 and § 2-381.01.

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 2-308.21.
1981 Ed., § 1-1188.21.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-232 substituted “Attorney General for the District of Columbia” for “Corporation Counsel.”
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 added the last sentence.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 112(a) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.